Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2382.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
New Section 1. Any school district that offers any course or other
instruction that addresses human growth, human development or
human sexuality shall include, as part of such course or instruction, a
presentation of a high-quality, computer-generated animation or high-
definition ultrasound of at least three minutes in duration that shows the
development of the brain, heart and other vital organs in early human
fetal development.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 72-253 is hereby amended to read as follows: 72-
253. (a) The state board of education may authorize members thereof to
attend in-state meetings for participation in matters of educational
interest to the state of Kansas, and when attending a meeting so
authorized, members shall receive compensation and travel expenses
and subsistence expenses or allowances as provided in K.S.A. 75-3212,
and amendments thereto, for members of the legislature. Whenever
under any provision of law, a member of the state board of education is
authorized to attend an out-of-state meeting, or whenever the state
board of education authorizes one of its members to attend an out-of-
state meeting for participation in matters of educational interest to the
state of Kansas such members, when attending a meeting so authorized,
shall receive compensation and travel expenses and or subsistence
expenses as provided in K.S.A. 75-3212, and amendments thereto, for
members of the legislature.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 75-3212, and
amendments thereto, during any fiscal year, each member of the board
of education shall receive compensation in an amount established by
the state board of education for the member's service at regularly
scheduled meetings of the board of education and any other in-state
meeting for participation in matters of educational interest to the state
of Kansas.

SENATE Substitute for HOUSE BILL No. 2382—page 2
Sec. 3. K.S.A. 72-253 is hereby repealed.
Sec. 4. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.
I hereby certify that the above BILL originated in the HOUSE, and was
adopted by that body
HOUSE adopted
Conference Committee Report
Speaker of the House.
Chief Clerk of the House.
Passed the SENATE
as amended
SENATE adopted
Conference Committee Report
President of the Senate.
Secretary of the Senate.
APPROVED
Governor.